District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “On-Site Services Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “DHS” means the Department of Human Services.
(2) “Grant recipient” means a qualifying housing provider who is selected and
receives grant money from the On-Site Services Program.
(3) “Nonprofit administrator” means the nonprofit organization selected by DHS
to administer the On-Site Services Program.
(4) “On-site services” means services that promote resident stability, self-
sufficiency, skill-building, or health, which may include health services, legal services, food and
nutrition services, childcare services, employment services, after-school programs, and social
activities that promote community building.
(5) “Program” means the On-Site Services Program established in section 3.


(6) “Qualifying housing provider” means the owner of one or more buildings in a
single complex that, in total, contains at least 20 separate dwelling units for rent where, over the
previous 6 months, an average of at least 30% of the total dwelling units for rent have been
leased to recipients of any permanent housing subsidy as determined by DHS in collaboration
with District housing agencies and the District of Columbia Housing Authority.
Sec. 3. Establishment of On-Site Services Program.
(a) There is established the On-Site Services Program, to be overseen and enforced by
DHS, to provide funding to qualifying housing providers to provide tenants with on-site services.
(b) DHS shall contract with a nonprofit organization that is headquartered in the District
to create and administer the Program as the nonprofit administrator.
Sec. 4. Application requirements.
(a) To participate in the Program, a qualifying housing provider may apply pursuant to
the rules issued by the nonprofit administrator. The nonprofit administrator may issue a 12-
month grant to a selected qualifying housing provider, subject to the following requirements:
(1) The total grant amount issued to any one selected qualifying housing provider
under the Program shall not exceed the amount totaling $2,000 multiplied by the number of units
in the complex being served or $200,000, whichever is the lesser amount;
(2) All grant money must be used to provide the on-site services or reasonable
administrative costs related to providing the on-site services;
(3) All residents of the complex owned by the selected qualifying housing
provider shall be eligible to participate in the on-site services made available by the Program;
and


(4) On-site services shall be provided by the selected qualifying housing provider,
its staff, or contractors within the complex or within one-quarter mile of the complex.
(b) In its Program application, the qualifying housing provider must:
(1) Demonstrate that a majority of the units in the complex has indicated through
a survey or a vote that they approve of the qualifying housing provider’s proposed on-site
services;
(2) Demonstrate that its staff or its contractors have the qualifications and
expertise needed, as determined by the nonprofit administrator, to successfully provide the on-
site services proposed; and
(3) Provide a written proposal of outcomes promoting resident stability, self-
sufficiency, skill-building, or health, expected from the on-site services.
(c) DHS, in collaboration with relevant District housing agencies and the District of
Columbia Housing Authority, shall determine whether an applicant is a qualifying housing
provider.
Sec. 5. Extension of grants.
Grants under the Program may be eligible to be extended for up to an additional 24
months if:
(1) The annual progress report from the grant recipient to the nonprofit
administrator demonstrates success in reaching the proposed outcomes;
(2) The grant recipient continues to maintain qualifying housing provider status;
(3) The grant recipient continues to demonstrate that a majority of units of the
complex have indicated, through a survey or a vote, that they approve of the on-site services; and
(4) Adequate funding for the Program is extended by the District.


Sec. 6. Resident rights.
(a) Resident participation in the on-site services shall be voluntary.
(b) Individuals or contractors providing on-site services shall not share any information
about residents with housing providers, unless the resident consents in writing to sharing the
resident’s information.
(c) A grant recipient shall not use a resident’s nonparticipation in the on-site services, or
any information gathered pursuant to a resident’s participation in the on-site services, as a basis
for any adverse action against the resident.
Sec. 7. Reporting requirements.
(a) All grant recipients shall submit an annual progress report to the nonprofit
administrator one year after receiving the grant and every subsequent calendar year that the grant
is renewed. If a grant recipient fails to submit an annual progress report, it shall be prohibited
from receiving grant money from the Program for the following year. The annual progress report
shall include:
(1) A list of the on-site services provided under the grant and the name of the
entity or contractor providing the on-site services, if applicable;
(2) The number of residents that have made use of each of the on-site services
provided;
(3) A financial report detailing the amount of grant money spent on services, staff,
and administrative costs associated with providing the on-site services; and
(4) A written explanation of the benefits brought to the residents through the on-
site services.


(b) (1) Upon completion of the first full fiscal year after the Program is in place, and on
an annual basis thereafter, the nonprofit administrator shall submit a progress report to DHS.
(2) DHS shall provide a summary of the Program progress report to the Council
within 45 days of receiving the report from the nonprofit administrator.
Sec. 8. Rules.
(a) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue
rules to implement the provisions of this act.
(b) The Mayor shall issue rules specifying the details that must be included in the
Program progress report submitted to DHS by the nonprofit administrator.
Sec. 9. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
100 an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
101 of the certification.
102 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
103 the District of Columbia Register. (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification
104 shall not affect the applicability of this act.
105 Sec. 10. Fiscal impact statement.
106 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
107 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
108 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


109 Sec. 11. Effective date.
110 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
111 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
112 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
113 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
114 Columbia Register.